test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_kulkkeet_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Verb - kulkkeet ok: # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kulkkeet+V+Inf: kulkkeet
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuljen
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuljet
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kulkkee
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuljema
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuljetta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuljethaan
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuljin
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuljit
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kulki
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuljima
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuljitta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuljethiin
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kulkenu
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kuljettu
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kulkenheet
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kulkkeeva
     kulkkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kulkkeevat
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kuljettava
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kuljettavat

     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kulkisin
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kulkisit
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kulkis
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kulkisimma
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kulkisitta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kuljettais
     kulkkeet+V+Pass+Cond: kuljettais

     kulkkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kulje
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kulkekkaa
     
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kulkemassa
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kulkemasta
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kulkemhaan
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kulkemalla
     kulkkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kulkematta
